Utah statutes.
31A-9-602.   Fraternal expenditures and activities.
(1)  Every fraternal shall report to the commissioner the information required
by the commissioner concerning expenditures made by the fraternal and other
activities and programs of the fraternal or its members in fulfillment of the
purposes of Subsection 31A-9-101(1)(a)(ii)(B) or in maintaining its fraternal
character.
(2)  A fraternal may create, maintain, and operate social, intellectual,
educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic, or religious
institutions for the benefit of its members or their families or dependents or
for children insured by the fraternal. For that purpose, it may own, hold, or
lease real or personal property within or outside of this state. All that
property is reported in the annual statement or an appendix to it, but the
property is given only a nominal value in the statement. No profit may be made
on those institutions, but the income and expenditures are reported separately
in, or as an appendix to, the annual statement. Any of these institutions may
be separately incorporated under Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business
Corporation Act, and ownership of its stock shall be reported at a nominal
value.
(3)  The fraternal may not own or operate a funeral or undertaking
establishment.
